tests/feature/test-xor-multi.lexd
PATTERNS
Phrase[^[nofruit,nocolor]]

PATTERN Phrase
Adj Noun

LEXICON Adj
bright[nofruit]
green
tasty[nocolor]
impetuous[nofruit,nocolor]

LEXICON Noun
apple[nocolor]
orange
green[nofruit]
cat[nofruit,nocolor]
